Utah statutes.
31A-4-116.   Adverse benefit determination procedures.
(1)  If an insurer has established a complaint resolution body or grievance
appeal board, the body or board shall include at least one consumer
representative.
(2) Adverse benefit determination procedures for health insurance policies and
health maintenance organization contracts shall be established in accordance
Section 31A-22-629.
